Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2107
Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards; office space; furniture; equipment; supplies; personnel.

The Department of Transportation shall furnish the Board of Public Roads Classifications and Standards with necessary office space, furniture, equipment, and supplies as well as necessary professional, technical, and clerical assistance.

Laws 1969, c. 312, § 7, p. 1123;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 148;

Laws 2021, LB174, § 3.